Washington statutes.
RCW 43.09.480

Long-term services and supports trust program—Audit—Report.

By December 1, 2032, the state auditor must conduct a comprehensive evaluation of the long-term services and supports trust program established in chapter 50B.04 RCW and deliver a report, including a conclusion and recommendations for improvement to the legislature regarding:

(1) Program operations, including the performance of the long-term services and supports trust commission established in RCW 50B.04.030;

(2) Program financial status, including solvency, the value of the benefit provided, and the financial balance of program benefits to costs;

(3) The overall efficacy of the program, based on the established goals under chapter 363, Laws of 2019 including, but not limited to:

(a) Delaying middle class families' need to spend to poverty to receive medicaid-funded long-term care;

(b) Strengthening the state economy through improving workforce participation;

(c) Reducing the caseload and expenditures of the state medicaid program on long-term care; and

(d) Obtaining shared savings through a medicaid demonstration waiver.

[ 2019 c 363 s 18.]